District of Columbia statutes.
26-1314

Real property held and conveyed by companies.

Any company operating under this chapter may lease, purchase, hold, and convey real property in which the offices of the company are located not to exceed in value the capital and surplus of the company, and such in addition as it may acquire in satisfaction of debts due the corporation under sales, decrees, judgments, and mortgages. But no such association shall hold the possession of any real estate under foreclosure of mortgage, or the title and possession of any real estate purchased to secure any debts due to it, for a longer period than 5 years.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1306, ch. 854, § 726
Apr. 19, 1920, 41 Stat. 566, ch. 153

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 26-414.
1973 Ed., § 26-314.